Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB600.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to those powers granted to counties by statute for the collection of ad valorem taxes, a county may
enforce collection of any tax bill due to the county by the procedure authorized in KRS 91.481 to 91.527, subject to
the statute of limitations in KRS 134.546.
Section 2. KRS 134.504 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The department shall be responsible for the collection of certificates of delinquency and personal
property certificates of delinquency.
(b) The provisions of this section relating to certificates of delinquency shall also apply to personal
property certificates of delinquency unless otherwise specifically noted.
(c) The department shall offer the collection duties related to certificates of delinquency and personal
property certificates of delinquency to the county attorney in each county, unless the department
determines that a county attorney has previously failed to perform collection duties in a reasonable and
acceptable manner.
(2) Any county attorney desiring to perform the collection duties shall enter into a contract with the department on
an annual basis.
(3) The terms of the contract shall:
(a) Specify the duties to be undertaken by the county attorney, which shall include, at a minimum, the
duties set forth in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) [. The terms of the contract shall also ]Provide that, if the county attorney fails to perform the duties
required by the contract during the contract period, the department may assume all collection
responsibilities; and
(c) Allow the county attorney, at the option of the county attorney, to enforce collection of a certificate of
delinquency by the procedure established in KRS 91.481 to 91.527 and authorized by Section 1 of this
Act .
(4) The following duties shall be performed by the department or the county attorney, as the case may be, with
regard to each certificate of delinquency:
(a) Within thirty (30) days after the establishment of a certificate of delinquency, the county attorney or the
department shall mail a notice by regular mail to the owner of record on the assessment date at the
address on the records of the property valuation administrator, or to the in-care-of address if an in-care-
of address is provided as required by subsection (5) of this section. The notice shall:
1. Include the name, address, and telephone number of a contact person in the county attorney's
office or the department, as the case may be;
2. Advise that:
a. The certificate of delinquency is a lien of record against the property on which the taxes
are due;
b. The amounts due are a personal obligation of the taxpayer on the assessment date; and
c. The certificate bears interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) and, if not paid, will be
subject to collection by the county attorney or the department as provided by law;
3. Include the total amount due as of the date of the notice;
4. Include in bold print in at least twelve (12) point font, a statement advising the taxpayer that
anytime after ninety (90) days from the creation of the certificate of delinquency, the certificate
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
of delinquency may be paid by a third-party purchaser and, that if so paid, the certificate of
delinquency will be subject to collection by the third-party purchaser as provided by law. The
notice shall also advise that a third-party purchaser may impose substantial additional
administrative costs and fees associated with collection in addition to the amount due on the
certificate of delinquency, and that collection actions may include foreclosure. This provision
shall not be included in notices sent for personal property certificates of delinquency; and
5. Advise that the taxpayer may qualify for a payment plan with the county attorney or the
department, if the taxpayer meets the requirements established by the county attorney or the
department, and if terms are agreed to prior to the date of the sale;
(b) The county attorney or the department shall file in the office of the county clerk a list of the names and
addresses to which the thirty (30) day notice was mailed along with a certificate attesting that the
notices were mailed in accordance with the requirements of this section;
(c) 1. All thirty (30) day notices returned as undeliverable shall be submitted by the county attorney or
department to the property valuation administrator, and a list of the returned notices shall be filed
with the county clerk, who shall record the list in the order book of the county.
2. The property valuation administrator shall attempt to correct inadequate or erroneous addresses
and, if property has been transferred, shall determine the new owner, current mailing address,
and in-care-of address, if any, as provided in KRS 382.135.
3. The property valuation administrator shall return the notices with the corrected information to the
county attorney or the department within twenty (20) days of receipt.
4. Upon receipt of the new information from the property valuation administrator, the county
attorney or the department shall resend the notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection
using the updated information;
(d) 1. At least twenty (20) days after the mailing of the thirty (30) day notice required by paragraph (a)
of this subsection, but within sixty (60) days of the establishment of a certificate of delinquency,
the county attorney or department shall send a second notice, by regular mail, to owners of
record whose tax bills remain delinquent, or to the in-care-of addresses or corrected address, if
information regarding a new property owner has been received by the county attorney or the
department under the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection. The notice shall include, at a
minimum, the following information:
a. The name, address, and telephone number of a contact person in the county attorney's
office or the department, as the case may be;
b. A statement that a sale of tax claims shall[will] be held by the county clerk on the date
established by the department for the sale. The text of the statement shall include the
actual sale date, as well as a statement noting that the certificate of delinquency may be
paid by a third-party purchaser at the sale, and if the certificate of delinquency is paid by a
third-party purchaser, it shall[will] be subject to collection by the third-party purchaser as
provided by law, that significant additional collection fees shall[will] be imposed by the
third-party purchaser, and that collection actions may include foreclosure. This statement
shall not be included in notices sent to owners of property subject to a personal property
certificate of delinquency; and
c. A statement that the taxpayer may qualify for a payment plan with the county attorney or
the department, if the taxpayer meets the requirements established by the county attorney
or the department, and if terms are agreed to prior to the date of the sale.
2. The county attorney or the department shall file in the office of the county clerk a list of the
names and addresses to which the sixty (60) day notice was mailed, along with a certificate
attesting that the notices were mailed in accordance with the requirements of this section.
3. If the notice required by paragraph (c) of this subsection is returned as undeliverable, and the
property valuation administrator is not able to provide a corrected or updated address, the county
attorney or the department shall address the sixty (60) day notice to "Occupant" and shall mail
the notice to the address of the property to which the certificate of delinquency applies;

CHAPTER 48 3
(e) The county attorney or the department shall deliver to the property valuation administrator, at the same
time the notice required by paragraph (d) of this subsection is sent, a list of the owners whose tax bills
remain delinquent. The property valuation administrator shall review this list in accordance with KRS
132.220 to establish that the properties on the list can be identified and physically located; and
(f) 1. Anytime after the expiration of the one (1) year tolling period established by KRS 134.546, the
county attorney or department may institute an action to collect the amount due on a certificate
of delinquency owned by the taxing jurisdictions and in the possession of the county clerk.
2. At least forty-five (45) days before instituting a legal action, the county attorney or department
shall send, by regular mail, a notice of intent to initiate legal action to enforce the lien.
3. The notice shall be sent to the owner of record of the property or to the in-care-of address or
corrected address if either has been provided pursuant to this section.
(5) If property subject to a certificate of delinquency has been transferred in any year after the assessment date, the
property valuation administrator shall determine the in-care-of address supplied in the deed pursuant to KRS
382.135 and shall provide that information to the county attorney or the department.
(6) (a) Failure of the county attorney or the department to mail the notices required in subsection (4) of this
section shall not affect the validity of the claim of the state, county, school district, and taxing district.
However, the county attorney or the department shall not receive any compensation, commission, or
payment related to any certificate of delinquency for which the notices required by the provisions of
subsection (4) of this section are not sent.
(b) For each notice mailed, one dollar ($1) shall be added to the amount of the certificate of delinquency, to
offset the cost of mailing, and, upon collection, the county attorney or the department shall be paid
the[such] amounts as reimbursement for mailing costs.
(7) (a) As compensation for the collection duties performed pursuant to a contract with the department, a
county attorney shall be paid twenty percent (20%) of the amount due each taxing unit during the
contract period, whether the amount is paid voluntarily, through sale, or under court order, and whether
the amount is paid to the county clerk or the county attorney. The fee for the county attorney shall be
added to the amount of the certificate of delinquency and shall be paid by the person paying the
certificate of delinquency.
(b) If payment in full is voluntarily made by the taxpayer to the county attorney or county clerk within five
(5) days of the filing of the tax claim with the county clerk, the county attorney fee shall be waived.
(c) 1. If a county attorney files a court action or files a cross-claim, the county attorney shall be paid
the greater of:
a. Reasonable attorney's fees and costs that arise from the prosecution of collection
remedies or the protection of a certificate of delinquency during litigation; or
b. [Shall be paid ]An additional fee of thirteen percent (13%) of the amount of the certificate
of delinquency and shall be reimbursed for costs incident to the court action. The
additional fee and costs incident to the litigation shall be added to the certificate of
delinquency and shall be paid by the person paying the certificate of delinquency.
2. For purposes of subparagraph 1.a. of this paragraph:
a. Actual attorney's fees up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) may be reasonable if the fees
are based upon documented work performed at a rate commensurate with hourly rates
customarily charged by private attorneys in that jurisdiction for similar services. A flat
fee rate, without hours documented for work performed, may be reasonable if the flat
fee rate is determined to be discounted from the usual and customary rates for
comparable work; and
b. Any attorney's fee arising from the litigation in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000)
shall be reasonable if the court finds that the county attorney incurred actual attorney's
fees in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and the additional fees were warranted
based upon the complexity of the issues presented in the litigation.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) If more than one (1) county attorney renders necessary services to collect on a certificate of
delinquency, the county attorney serving the last notice or rendering the last substantial service
preceding collection shall be entitled to the fee.
(8) (a) The county attorney shall establish a system to accept installment payments from delinquent taxpayers.
The county attorney may, during the contract period, enter into an agreement with a delinquent taxpayer
to accept installment payments on the certificates of delinquency. The agreement shall not waive the
county attorney's right to initiate court action or other authorized collection activities if the taxpayer
does not make payments in accordance with the agreement.
(b) The county attorney may, upon written request of the taxpayer for good cause and with agreement of
the affected taxing jurisdiction or fee recipient, waive or reduce fees and penalties that are part of a
certificate of delinquency during settlement or negotiation with a taxpayer in accordance with guidance
provided by the department.
(9) Any action by the county attorney authorized by this chapter shall be filed on relation of the commissioner. A
copy of any judgment obtained by the county attorney shall be sent to the department.
(10) (a) The county attorney shall notify the county clerk and the department of the filing of an action[a suit] at
the time the action[suit] is filed, and of payment agreements at the time the[such] agreements are
entered into. The county clerk shall note on the certificate of delinquency the filing of the lawsuit or the
existence of the payment agreement, and these certificates of delinquency shall not be available for
purchase or payment by a third-party purchaser.
(b) The county attorney shall provide to the county clerk at least ten (10) days but not more than twenty
(20) days prior to the annual sale date for the county established pursuant to KRS 134.128, a protected
list of current year certificates of delinquency that are:
1. Under a payment plan with the county attorney on which payments are current;
2. Involved in litigation initiated by the county attorney or in which the county attorney responds or
files an answer;
3. Involved in bankruptcy litigation in which the county attorney has filed a claim; or
4. Included on a list of protected properties submitted to the county attorney by a vacant property
review commission or an alternative government entity as provided in KRS 99.727.
The list shall include sufficient detail for the county clerk to accurately identify the property.
(c) The county attorney shall notify the county clerk of the failure of any payment agreement and, upon
notification to the clerk, the certificate of delinquency shall be available for purchase.
(11) The department may make its delinquent tax collection databases and other technical resources, including but
not limited to tax refund offsetting, available to the county attorney upon request from the county attorney.
The county attorney seeking assistance shall enter into any agreements required by the department to protect
taxpayer confidentiality, to ensure database integrity, or to address the concerns of the department.
(12) (a) If a county attorney chooses not to contract for collection duties, or if a county attorney fails to perform
the duties required by the contract, the department shall assume responsibility for all uncollected
certificates of delinquency and personal property certificates of delinquency, including, at the option of
the department, those with pending court action or for which the county attorney has entered into an
installment payment agreement.
(b) If the department assumes or retains responsibility for the collection of certificates of delinquency and
personal property certificates of delinquency, the twenty percent (20%) fee that would have been paid
to the county attorney under subsection (7) of this section, and any other fees or costs established by
this section for the county attorney shall be paid to the department for deposit in the delinquent tax fund
provided for under KRS 134.552.
Section 3. KRS 91.481 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527 and 92.810, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Collector" means any city of the first class or any city which has adopted the provisions of KRS 65.8834;
(2) "Land taxes" mean general taxes on real property and includes[include] the taxes both on land and the
improvements on the land[thereon];

CHAPTER 48 5
(3) "Master commissioner" or "circuit clerk" means the master commissioner and the circuit clerk of the judicial
circuit[district] in which any collector is located;
(4) "Tax bill" means the statement of the land taxes and any tax[the] lien[ thereon], levied and assessed by any
taxing authority; and
(5) "Tax lien" means the lien of any tax bill established pursuant to KRS 91.560.
Section 4. KRS 91.484 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) As early as practicable in July of each year, the collector of taxes shall[, as early in the month of July
as is practicable,] make a list of all the tax bills remaining unpaid, in whole or in part,[ unpaid] on the
date due and payable and[. He] shall at once file the list with the director of finance.
(b) A false report or a failure to report shall not invalidate subsequent proceedings for collection of the tax.
(2) The list of delinquent properties and lots prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall contain the
following:
(a) A description of the land by district, block, lot, and sub-lot, and include the street address;[.]
(b) A statement of the amount of each tax bill upon the[such] parcel, including:
1. All tax bills on the parcel[thereon] which are delinquent;[,]
2. The year of the assessment;[,]
3. The block, lot, and sub-lot of each tax bill;[ and]
4. The date from which and the rate at which interest and penalties shall be computed;[,] and
5. An appropriate designation of the owner or holder of each tax bill; and[. ]
(c) The name of the last known person appearing on the records of the collector in whose name the tax bills
on the[such] real estate were listed or charged for the year preceding the calendar year in which the[
such] list is filed.
Section 5. KRS 91.487 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If any of the land or lots against which delinquent taxes are owed[,] remain unreleased or unpaid six (6)
calendar months from the date due and payable, the collector may file suit in the Circuit Court of the county in
which the property is located against the[such] land or lots to enforce the lien of the city created under KRS
91.560.
(2) The collector shall note on the tax bill the fact that a legal action[suit] has been filed to collect the
taxes[commenced].
(3) The collector shall note on the list of all delinquent city land tax bills collectible by the city[, which are
delinquent,] prepared pursuant to KRS 91.481, that a legal action[suit] has been filed and shall include:
(a) The land or lots against which the action was filed; and
(b) The civil action number assigned by[give] the court for that tax bill,[docket the number of each suit]
and the date the action[suit] was commenced.
(4) It shall be a defense to an action for recovery of taxes against real property that the action was not commenced
within seven (7) years after delinquency.
(5) Any person interested in or the owner of any tract of land or lot contained in the records of delinquent land and
lots in the collector's office may release the[such] tract of land or lot, or any part of the land[thereof], from
the[such] city's lien on the property[thereon,] by paying the taxes due the collector, together with interest from
the date of delinquency.
(6) (a) If suit has[shall have] been commenced against any tract of land or lot for the collection of taxes, the
person desiring to have the land released before judgment shall pay:
1. [, in addition to ]The original taxes, interest, and costs,[cost] including attorneys' fees; and[, shall
pay]
2. To the collector, all necessary costs incurred in the court where the action[suit] is pending;[,] and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The collector shall account to the clerk of the court in which the action[suit] is filed for the court costs[
so] collected.
Section 6. KRS 91.488 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The collector may enforce city tax liens by bringing an action[suit] in rem against property[ so]
encumbered by the lien.
(b) An action brought under paragraph (a) of this subsection[This means of enforcement] shall not be the
exclusive remedy available to the collector and shall be in addition to all other remedies available at law
or equity.
(c) There shall be no limit on the[Any] number of parcels of real estate[ may be] joined in one (1) petition
or action[suit].
(2) Each separate tract or parcel of real estate joined in any one (1) action shall be:
(a) Included in a separate count to distinguish it from other parcels within the same action;[.]
(b) [(2) Each separate tract or parcel of real estate joined in any one (1) action shall be ]Listed by the
collector by its tax district, block, lot, and sub-lot; and[ shall be ]
(c) Separately indexed and docketed by the Circuit Court clerk in a book kept by the clerk for that purpose.
[For each parcel of real estate ]The Circuit Court clerk shall be allowed a fee of fifty cents ($0.50) for
each separately indexed tract or parcel of real estate which shall be taxed and paid as[ other] costs.
Section 7. KRS 91.4881 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A legal action[suit] for the enforcement of the tax liens brought pursuant to KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527
shall be instituted by filing a petition with the Circuit Court of the county in which the property is located.
The petition shall be[clerk a petition, containing a caption] in substantially the following form:
______________ Circuit Court
__________ Division
Case No. ___________
City of ______________ Plaintiff
VS.
___________ Parcels of Land Encumbered
with Delinquent Tax Liens Defendants
(2) (a) The petition[ also] shall contain a separate count for each parcel of real estate included in the action.
(b) Each count in the petition shall set forth those items of information required of the collector in KRS
91.484(2) and for each parcel shall list the name of any taxing authority or person of record:
1. Owning or holding any tax bill;
2. Owning or claiming any right, title, or interest in or to the parcel;[,] or
3. Holding any lien upon[,] any[ such] parcel of real estate identified[as set out] in the petition; or
4. Asserting any other[, and a] claim against the property.
(c) The specific right, title, or interest[ either] owned or claimed, or lien held, by any taxing authority other
than the city or by other interested persons of record shall not be required to[need not] be set forth in
the petition[action].
(3) The petition shall conclude with a claim for relief that:
(a) All city tax liens upon the[such] real estate be enforced;[ that ]
(b) The court determine the amounts and priorities of all tax bills, together with interest, penalties, and
costs;[ that ]
(c) The court order the[such] real estate to be sold by the master commissioner pursuant to[ the provisions
of] KRS 426.560 to 426.715, except as otherwise provided in KRS 91.4885;[,] and[ that ]

CHAPTER 48 7
(d) A report of the sale be made by the master commissioner to the court for further proceedings under the
provisions of KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527.
(4) (a) The petition[ so] filed under this section shall have the same effect, with respect to each parcel of real
estate described, as a separate action[suit] instituted to enforce the tax lien against any one (1) of the
parcels of real estate.
(b) The invalidity of any separate count shall not in any way affect the validity of the remainder of the
proceedings with respect to any other count in the action.
Section 8. KRS 91.4882 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any action brought pursuant to KRS 91.488 to 91.4885 shall constitute an action in rem and the pleadings[
therein] shall consist of a petition and an answer or answers.
(2) (a) An answer to the petition may be filed by any person or taxing authority owning or claiming any right,
title, or interest in or to any tax bill constituting a tax lien on the real estate described in the petition or
by any person owning or claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, the[such] real estate.
(b) Any[ An] answer filed under this subsection:
1. Shall include the nature and amount of the interest and any defense or objection to the
enforcement of the tax liens listed in the petitions;[,] and
2. May include the allegations usually incorporated by the appropriate pleadings.
(3) An answer[Any answers] shall contain the caption and number of the case, and the count number or numbers,
as set out in the petition, of the parcels of real estate concerned. The[Such] answer shall[must] be filed with
the Circuit Court clerk and a copy of the answer shall be[thereof] served on the collector not later than fifty
(50) days after the date of the first publication of the notice of enforcement.
(4) [In the event of ]Failure to file an answer within the required[said] fifty (50) day period[,] may result in entry
of a default judgment[ may be taken] on all parcels of real estate for which no answer was[has been] filed.
(5) Any taxing authority owning or claiming any interest, right, or title in or to any tax bill constituting a tax lien
on the real property described in the petition filed pursuant to KRS 91.4881 may[ either] file a cross-claim or
join the action as a co-plaintiff pursuant to[using the provisions of] KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527,
notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter 134[134.010 et seq].
Section 9. KRS 91.4883 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty (30) days after[ the] filing[ with the Circuit Court clerk of] an enforcement action[suit] for the
collection of unpaid taxes with the Circuit Court clerk under[ the provisions of] KRS 91.481[91.484] to
91.527, the collector shall cause a notice of enforcement to be published two (2) times, once each week, during
successive weeks, and on the same day of each week, otherwise in the manner established in[accordance with
the provisions of] KRS Chapter 424.
(2) The[Such] notice shall be in substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF ENFORCEMENT OF LIEN FOR DELINQUENT LAND TAXES BY ACTION IN REM
Public Notice is hereby given that on the ______ day of _________, 20_____ [19_____], the City of ____________
of ___________ County, Kentucky, filed a petition, being Action Number _________, in the Circuit Court of
_________ County, Kentucky, at _________ (stating the city), for the enforcement of liens for delinquent land taxes
against the real estate situated in the[such] city, all as described in said petition.
The city seeks entry of[object of said suit is to obtain from the court] a judgment from the court enforcing the city's
tax and other liens against the[such] real estate and ordering the sale of the[such] real estate for the satisfaction of
the[said] liens[ thereon (except right of redemption in favor of the United States of America if any)], including
principal, interest, penalties, and costs, with the exception of any right of redemption in favor of the United States
of America, if any. The[Such] action is being brought against the real estate only and no personal judgment shall be
entered[ therein].
The count number assigned by the city to each parcel of real estate, a description of each[ such] parcel by
street address, and the property valuation administrator's tax parcel number, generally identified by [(]district, block,
lot, and sub-lot[)], a statement of the total principal amount of all delinquent city tax bills against each[ such] parcel
of real estate, all of which, as to each parcel, is more fully set out and mentioned by count in the[ aforesaid] petition,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
and the name of any taxing authority or person of record owning or holding any tax bill or claiming any right, title, or
interest in or to, or lien upon, any[ such] parcel of real estate as set out in the petition, are respectively as follows:
(Here set out the respective count numbers, property descriptions, names of taxpayers of record and statements of
total principal amounts of tax bills, and names of those other interested persons of record[ next above referred to].)
The total principal amounts of delinquent taxes set out in this notice do not include the lawful interest,
penalties, and costs which have accrued against the respective parcels of real estate.
Any person or taxing authority owning or holding any tax bill or claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or
lien upon, any identified[such] parcel of real estate is required to[must] file an answer to the action[such suit] in the
office of the Circuit Court clerk of _________ county in _________, and provide a copy of the[such] answer to[with]
the city of __________ in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure, on or before the _____ day of
_________, 20_____.[19_____ , and in such] The answer shall set forth in detail the nature and the amount of the[
such] interest in the property and any defense or objection to the enforcement of the tax liens, or any other
affirmative relief the person or taxing authority[he or it] may be entitled to assert with respect to the
property[thereto].
Any person having any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any parcel of identified[such] real estate
may have the city's claims against the[such] parcel dismissed from the action by paying all of the sums
due[mentioned therein] to the city of __________ including principal, interest, penalties, and costs then owing[due],
at any time prior to the enforcement sale of the[such] real estate by the master commissioner.
[In the event of ]Failure to answer on or before the date[ herein] fixed as the last day for filing answer in the
action[suit], by any person having the right to answer,[ such person] shall[ be] forever bar and foreclose[barred and
foreclosed as to] any defense or objection he or she might have to the enforcement of the[such] liens for delinquent
taxes and the judgment of enforcement may be taken by default. Redemption may be made for a period of sixty (60)
days after the master commissioner's enforcement sale, if the sale price is less than the parcel's current assessed value
as certified by the Department of Revenue. Each[ such] person having any right, title, or interest in or to, or any lien
upon, any[ such] parcel of real estate described in the petition[ so] failing to answer or redeem, as set out
above[aforesaid], shall be forever barred and foreclosed of any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, or any
equity of redemption in the[said] real estate.
_________________, Kentucky
(name of city)
_________________
Attorney
_________________
_________________
_________________
Address
_________________
Phone
_________________
Date of first publication
Section 10. KRS 91.4884 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The collector shall also cause to be prepared and sent by certified mail, return receipt requested [mailed by
first class mail, certified by a United States postal service certificate of mailing], within thirty (30) days after
the filing of the[such] petition, a[ brief] notice of the filing of the action[suit] to any taxing authority or person
of record owning or holding any tax bills or claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any[
such] parcel of real estate as set out in the petition.
(2) The notice shall be substantially as follows:
To the person to whom this notice is addressed:

CHAPTER 48 9
Public records indicate that you may own or claim some right, title, or interest in or to, or hold a lien upon, a
certain parcel of real estate identified as[located at] (here insert the street address and the property valuation
administrator's tax parcel number) and set out in count number _____ in a[ certain] petition bearing Action No.
_______ filed in the Circuit Court of ________ County, Kentucky at __________ (city) on _________,
20_____[19_____], civil action number _____, in which[wherein] an enforcement of the liens of various delinquent
tax bills is sought by entry of[and] a court order[ asked] for the purpose of selling the[said] real estate at a public sale
for payment of all delinquent tax bills, together with interest, penalties, and costs. Publication of the notice of[ such]
enforcement was given[commenced] on the _____ day of ________, 20___[19....], in __________ (here insert name
of city).
Public records in the office of the county clerk or other public office indicate you may own or claim some
interest in this parcel by reason of (Here insert specific reference to any public document of record as disclosed in a
thorough examination of title status.).
Unless all delinquent city taxes are paid upon the parcel of real estate described in the[said] petition, and
unless the owners of the[said] real estate shall have either[ have] discharged any city tax liens, or satisfied any
judgment rendered on the[said] liens in favor of the city, prior to the time of the enforcement sale of the[such] real
estate by the master commissioner, or within sixty (60) days after the sale if the purchase price at sale is less than the
parcel's certified assessed value, the owner or any taxing authority or person of record claiming any right, title, or
interest in or to, or lien upon, any identified[such] parcel of real estate shall be forever barred and foreclosed of all
right, title, and interest, and equity of redemption in and to the[such] parcel of real estate. Any owner, taxing
authority, or person of record claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, of lien upon the property[; provided],
however,[ that any such person] shall have the right to file an answer in the action setting forth in detail the nature
and amount of the interest and any defense or objection to the enforcement. The answer shall be filed[said suit] on
or before the ______ day of ________, 20_____[19____ ], in the office of the Circuit Court clerk and copy of the
answer shall be served upon[thereof to] the city of _________, in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil
Procedure[, setting forth in detail the nature and amount of the interest and any defense or objection to the
enforcement].
Dated ____________, 20____ [19____] ______________, Kentucky
(Name of city)
___________________
Attorney
___________________
___________________
___________________
Address
___________________
Phone
Section 11. KRS 91.4885 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The court shall order the master commissioner to sell, pursuant to[ the provisions of] KRS 426.560 to
426.715, except as otherwise provided in this section, each parcel separately by individual count
number.
(b) The court shall further order that a report of the sale be made by the master commissioner to the court
for further proceedings under[ the provisions of] KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527.
(2) (a) Prior to the master commissioner's setting each parcel for sale pursuant to court order, the collector shall
file with the Circuit Court clerk an affidavit as to the most recent certified tax assessment of each parcel
to be sold.
(b) The most recent certified assessment of a property shall be the property valuation administrator's last
assessment as[ which shall have been] certified by the Kentucky Department of Revenue to the county
clerk, as required by KRS 133.180.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The[ most recent certified] assessment[ as sworn to] in the affidavit furnished by the collector under
subsection (2) of this section shall be used in all actions brought under KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527 to
determine the owner's equity of redemption as provided by KRS 91.511(2).
Section 12. KRS 91.494 is amended to read as follows:
Affidavits confirming the[ of] publication of notice and of posting, mailing, or other acts required by the provisions
of KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527 shall be filed in the office of the circuit clerk prior to the trial, and[ when so filed]
shall constitute[ part of the evidentiary document in the enforcement suit. The affidavits shall be] prima facie
evidence of the performance of acts[ therein] described in the affidavit,[ and may be so used in the trial of the suit]
unless challenged by verified answer duly filed in the suit.
Section 13. KRS 91.501 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any legal action[suit] to collect delinquent tax bills which may be pending at the time of the
commencement of any action[suit] brought under[ the provisions of] KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527[,]
affecting the same land[,] shall be consolidated with the action[such suit] brought under KRS
91.481[91.484] to 91.527.
(b) In any consolidated action:
1. The parties to the pending legal action at the time of the commencement of an action brought
under KRS 91.481 to 91.527 [suit] shall file an answer or other responsive pleading in the
consolidated action; and[answers, but]
2. Any tax bill sought to be collected in any pending action[suit] may be included in any list in the
petition[included as a part of any] petition filed by the collector.
(c) All amounts due on any tax bill[If so] included under paragraph (b)2. of this subsection in a
consolidated action[, the inclusion shall act as an abatement of any pending suit, and all amounts then
due on any such tax bill], including interest, penalties, and costs, shall be listed and charged, and[ shall
continue in force] the liens against the respective parcel of real estate listed in the petition filed pursuant
to[ the provisions of] KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527 shall continue in force.
(2) Any consolidated action described in subsection (1) of this section[suit brought under the provisions of KRS
91.484 to 91.527, involving delinquent tax bills sought to be collected by any suit pending at the time suit is
brought under KRS 91.484 to 91.527,] shall be tried as all other actions, and the statute of limitations shall not
prevent the parties to the previous[such] pending action[suit] from asserting all rights and defenses which they
may[then] have.
(3) Any cross-claim of a taxing authority under KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527 may include a claim for the
immediate enforcement of any ad valorem tax owed to the taxing authority, notwithstanding[ the provisions
of] Chapter 134[KRS 134.010 et seq].
Section 14. KRS 91.504 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the trial of the action on the issue[cause upon the question] of enforcement, the tax bill shall be
prima facie proof that the tax described in the tax bill has been validly assessed at the time indicated by
the tax bill and that the tax is unpaid.
(b) Any person alleging any jurisdictional defect or invalidity in the tax bill, or in the sale of the tax bill,
shall:[thereof must]
1. Particularly specify in his or her answer the defect or basis of the alleged invalidity;[,] and
[must, upon trial,]
2. Affirmatively establish the defense at trial.
(2) After the court has[ first] determined the:
(a) Validity of the tax liens of all tax bills affecting parcels of real estate described in the petition; and[,
the]
(b) Priorities of the tax bills and other interests[interest] and the amount due[ thereon], including principal,
interest, penalties, and costs;[,]
the court shall enter a judgment for the[of] sale of the property and shall fix the time and place of the
judgment sale.

CHAPTER 48 11
(3) The petition shall be dismissed as to any parcel of real estate released or redeemed prior to the time fixed for
the master commissioner's sale as provided in KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527.
(4) (a) If the parcel of real estate sold at the master commissioner's judgment sale is sold for a sum sufficient to
fully pay the principal amount of all tax bills included in the judgment together with interest, penalties,
and costs, and for no more, and the[such] sale is confirmed by the court, then all other proceedings as to
those[such] parcels of real estate shall be finally dismissed as to all parties of interest other than tax bill
owners or holders, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.[; provided, however, that ]
(b) Any party seeking relief other than an interest in, or lien upon, the real estate may continue with the
action[said suit] to a final adjudication of the[such] other issues.
(c) An appeal may be taken[had] as to any claim attacking the validity of the tax bill or bills or the
priorities as to payment of proceeds of the judgment sale.
(5) (a) If the parcel of real property sold at the master commissioner's sale is:
1. Sold for a sum greater than the total amount necessary to pay the principal amount of all tax bills
included in the judgment, together with interest, penalties, and costs, and the sale is confirmed by
the court, and no appeal is taken by:
a. Any person claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, the parcel of real
estate; or[ by ]
b. Any person or taxing authority owning,[ or] holding, or claiming any right, title, or
interest in or to any tax bills;
within the time fixed by law for the filing of a notice of appeal, the court shall order the master
commissioner to make distribution to the owners or holders of the respective tax bill included in
the judgment of the amount found to be due, and in the order of priority.
(b) 1. After payments have been made under paragraph (a) of this subsection[Thereafter], all
proceedings in the action relating to those[suit shall be ordered by the court to be dismissed as to
such] persons owning, holding, or claiming any right, title, or interest in any[ such] tax bill paid
under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be dismissed by the court.[, and]
2. The case shall proceed as to any parties claiming any right, title, or interest, or lien upon, the
parcel of real estate affected by the[such] tax bill as to their respective claims to the surplus
funds[ then] remaining in the hands of the court.
(6) (a) Whenever an answer is filed to the petition, a severance of the action as to all parcels of real estate
affected by the[such] answer shall be granted, and the issues raised by the petition and the answer shall
be tried separate and apart from the other issues in the action.[suit, but]
(b) The granting of the severance under this subsection shall not delay the trial or other disposition of any
other issues in the case.
(7) (a) A separate appeal may be taken from any other issue in the case. A separate appeal may be taken from
any action of the court affecting any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, the[such] real estate,
other than issues of law and fact, affecting the amount or validity of the lien of tax bills.[, but]
(b) 1. The proceeding to enforce the lien of any tax bills shall not be stayed by the appeal.
2. The trial shall be conducted by the court without[ the aid of] a jury.
3. This action shall take precedence over and be triable before any other actions affecting the title
to the real estate upon motion of any interested party.
Section 15. KRS 91.507 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After the trial of the issues, the court shall render judgment as promptly as circumstances permit.
(2) If the court finds that no tax bill was delinquent when the action[suit] was instituted or tried,[ then] the
judgment of the court shall be that the action[cause] be dismissed as to the parcels of real estate described in
the tax bill.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) If the evidence warrants, the judgment may be for the principal amount of the delinquent tax bill upon the real
estate upon which the action[suit] was brought, together with interest, penalties, and court costs computed as
of the date of the judgment.
(4) The court may decree that the lien upon the parcel of real estate described in the tax bill be enforced and
the[such] real estate be sold by the master commissioner with[and] the cost continued for further proceedings
as provided by KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527.
Section 16. KRS 91.511 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At any time prior to the sale of the property, any person having any right, title, or interest in, or lien upon, any
parcel of real estate described in the petition may discharge any city lien or satisfy a judgment in favor of the
city as to the[said] parcel of real estate by paying to the collector the entirety of the lien or judgment[all of the
sums mentioned therein], including the principal, interest, penalties, and costs[ then due].
(2) (a) If the property is sold pursuant to the judgment or order of the court and does not bring its most recent
assessed value certified by the Department of Revenue to the county clerk as required by KRS 133.180,
the owner may redeem the property[it] within sixty (60) days from the day of the sale[,] by paying the
purchaser an amount equal to the original purchase price plus[money and] interest at the rate of
eighteen percent (18%) per annum.
(b) Any owner who redeems his or her land under this subsection shall take a receipt from the purchaser
and lodge it with the clerk of the court. The receipt shall be entered upon the records of the court.
(3) (a) The owner may tender the redemption money to the purchaser or the purchaser's[, his] agent or
attorney, if found in the county where the land lies, or in the county in which the judgment was obtained
or order of sale made.
(b) If the money is refused, or if the purchaser does not reside in either of the counties described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the owner may, before the expiration of the right of redemption, file
with[go to] the clerk of the court in which the judgment was rendered or the order was made, an[and
make] affidavit:
1. Of the tender and refusal;[,] or
2. That the purchaser or his or her agent or attorney do not reside in either of the counties.
(c) The owner[He] may then pay to the clerk the redemption money, and the clerk shall give the owner a
receipt for the payment[therefor] and file the affidavit in the case file[among the papers] of the action.
(4) (a) When the right of redemption exists, the owner may remain in possession of the property until it
expires. Real property so sold shall not be conveyed to the purchaser until the right of redemption has
expired.
(b) If the property[it] is redeemed, the sale shall, from and after the redemption, or from and after the
deposit of the redemption money with the clerk, be null and void.
(5) In the event of failure to redeem within the period provided for redemption, the owner or any other party in
interest shall be barred forever of all his or her right, title, and interest in and to the parcel of real estate
described in the petition.
(6) Upon redemption[,] as permitted by this section, the person redeeming shall be entitled to a certificate of
redemption from the collector describing the property in the same manner as it is described in the petition and
the collector shall thereupon note on his or her records the word "redeemed" and the date of the payment
opposite the description of the parcel of real estate.
Section 17. KRS 91.514 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the confirmation of the sale by the court and the expiration of the right of redemption provided in
KRS 91.511, the title to any real estate purchased from the master commissioner pursuant to KRS
91.481 to 91.527 shall vest in the purchaser.
(b) The title of the real estate shall be an absolute estate in fee simple, subject to rights-of-way of public
utilities on which tax has been otherwise paid, and subject to any right of redemption of the United
States of America, if any.
(c) All persons, including the Commonwealth of Kentucky, minors, persons judicially found to be of
unsound mind[infants, incompetents], absentees, and nonresidents who may have had any right, title,

CHAPTER 48 13
interest, claim, or equity of redemption in or to, or lien upon the land shall be barred of all right, title,
interest, claim, lien, or equity of redemption, and the court shall order that immediate possession of the
real estate be given to the purchaser.
(d) Any person[ so] barred under paragraph (c) of this subsection shall[ thereafter] have as his or her
exclusive remedy a claim for a share of the proceeds of the sale of the real estate by the master
commissioner.
(2) Any[The] title vested under this section shall be subject to the liens of any tax bill which may have attached to
the parcel of real estate:
(a) Prior to the time of the filing of the petition affecting the parcel of real estate not then delinquent; and[,
or which may have attached]
(b) After the filing of the petition and prior to the expiration of the period provided for redemption and not
including any answer to such petition.
(3) If the parcel of real estate is sold to the city or to a land bank authority created pursuant to KRS 65.350 to
65.375, the title shall be free of any liens to the extent of the interest of any taxing authority in any such real
estate.
(4) The title shall not be subject to the lien of special tax bills which have attached to the parcel of real estate, but
the lien of the special tax bill shall attach to the proceeds of the master commissioner's sale or to the proceeds
of the ultimate sale of the parcel by the city.
(5) Failure of any party other than the purchaser to follow the procedures set out in KRS 91.484 to 91.527 shall
not affect the vesting of title in the purchaser.
Section 18. KRS 91.517 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After the master commissioner sells any parcel of real estate, the court shall, upon its own motion or upon
motion of any interested party, set the matter[cause down] for a hearing to confirm the sale, even if the[though
such] parcels are not all of the parcels of real estate described in the notice of the master commissioner's sale.
(2) If the sale is confirmed, the court shall order the proceeds of the sale applied in the following order:
(a) To the payment of all costs, including court costs, publication costs, and costs otherwise associated with
the action and sale of the parcel described in the particular count; and
(b) To the payment of all tax bills on the property, including principal, interest, and penalties.
(c) If after the payment under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection there remain any[, there is any
sum remaining of the] proceeds of the commissioner's sale of the property, the court shall[ try and]
determine the other issues in the suit with respect to that particular count.
(d) If any of the answering parties has filed an appeal and executed an appropriate supersedeas bond
prior to the appeal[specifically appealed], the court[, provided that the answering parties have, prior to
the appeal, executed an appropriate supersedeas bond,] shall retain custody of the funds pending
disposition of the appeal, and upon disposition of the appeal shall make distribution.
(e) If there are not sufficient proceeds of the sale to pay all claims in any class described, the court shall
order them to be paid in accordance with the priorities.
(3) If there are any funds remaining of the proceeds after the commissioner's sale and after the distribution of the
funds as set out in this section[herein set out] and no person entitled to any[ such] funds, whether or not a
party to the action[suit], has[shall have] appeared within two (2) years after the sale[,] and claimed the funds,
the funds[they] shall escheat to the state as provided in KRS Chapter 393.
Section 19. KRS 91.521 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The collector,[ or] any interested person, or anyone on behalf of a person who has been judicially found to be
of unsound mind[any incompetent] may appeal from the judgment confirming or disapproving the
commissioner's sale and the distribution of proceeds.
(2) No issues[questions] may be raised in[upon] the appeal that could have been raised in[upon] an appeal from
the judgment of the sale.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) Any appeal under this section[The appeals] shall be taken within thirty (30) days after the date of the
judgment.
(4) The requirement[necessity] for giving bond and the provisions of the bond[thereof] shall be the same as in the
case of an appeal from the judgment of sale.
Section 20. KRS 91.527 is amended to read as follows:
Any property or real estate acquired by the city by virtue of purchase at the commissioner's sale shall be held by the
city and[ any property so held] may be sold, transferred, leased, or otherwise utilized by the city within its sole
discretion.
Section 21. KRS 91.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The personal property of minors[infants] or persons judicially found to be of unsound mind shall not be
distrained for taxes assessed on their real property.
(2) The real property of a minor[an infant] or person judicially found to be of unsound mind shall not, during his
or her disability, after ascertainment of such disability by the city, be sold without the appointment of a
guardian ad litem to represent the interest of the[such] person, for less than its certified assessed value on any
judgment of sale rendered for taxes and costs alone, where the real property came to the minor[infant] or
person of unsound mind by descent, distribution, or devise, or by gift or settlement of a decedent[some person
then deceased], or where the real property belonged to the person of unsound mind before he or she was
adjudged to be[ became] of unsound mind.
(3) (a) An[No] entire estate shall not be sold, for taxes and costs chargeable to the owner of the particular
estate, for less than its certified assessed value, so as to defeat any reversion, remainder, or other future
estate outstanding, unless the reversioners, remaindermen, or holders of other future estates are
ascertained and are of full age.[, and no such ]
(b) An entire estate shall not[ever] be put up to sale unless the particular estate of the taxpayer has first
been put up and has failed to bring the amount of the taxes and costs.
Section 22. KRS 92.810 is amended to read as follows:
In addition to those powers granted in this chapter for the collection of ad valorem taxes, any urban-county
government or city of the home rule class may enforce collection of any tax bill due it by the procedure authorized by
the provisions of KRS 91.481[91.484] to 91.527, except the statute of limitations shall, in all cases, be that set forth in
KRS 134.546.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.